Illinois, session 104th, SB339.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Uniform Interstate Family Support Act is 5amended by changing Section 203 as follows: 6    (750 ILCS 22/203)7    Sec. 203. Initiating and responding tribunal of State. 8Under this Act, a tribunal of this State may serve as an 9initiating tribunal to forward proceedings to a tribunal of 10another state and and as a responding tribunal for proceedings 11initiated in another state or a foreign country.12(Source: P.A. 99-119, eff. 1-1-16.)